Hawaii statutes.
§342G-62 Solid waste disposal surcharge.
(a) There is established a solid waste management surcharge. The solid waste
management surcharge shall be 35 cents per ton of solid waste disposed of
within the State at permitted or unpermitted solid waste disposal facilities.
The surcharge shall be paid by the person or entity doing the disposal. The
owner or operator of the facility shall transfer all moneys collected from the
surcharge to the department through a quarterly reporting and payment schedule.
Estimates of quarterly solid waste disposal shall be submitted prior to the
first day of each quarter and the transfer of moneys collected shall occur
within thirty days of the end of each quarter.

(b) The surcharge collected pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the environmental management special fund. All
interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited in the fund shall become a part
of the fund. [L 1993, c 312, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 268, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next